Arkansas, session 2025, HB1742.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code §§ 2-18-102 through 2-18-109 are amended to
read as follows:
2-18-102. Penalty — Revocation of certificate.
(a)(1) Any person shall be guilty of a violation who:
(A) Falsely advertises or proclaims that seed has been
certified by the State Plant Board Department of Agriculture;
(B) Uses any emblem, label, or language for the purpose of
misleading a person into believing that seed has been certified by the board
department when it has not;
(C) Misuses any tag, label, or certificate issued by the
board department;
(D) Obtains or attempts to obtain certification for seed
or plants by making false statements or misrepresentations to the board
department or to the board's department's inspectors, deputies, or agents;
(E) Having received a certificate, violates any of the
rules of the board State Plant Board made under this chapter; or
(F) Violates any agreement made as a condition for
*CRH153*
03/10/2025 4:45:09 PM CRH153

HB1742
receiving a certificate.
(2) Upon conviction, an offender shall be punished by a fine of
not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than five hundred dollars
($500) for each offense.
(b)(1) When the person holds a certificate from the board department,
the certificate, after a hearing before the Director of the State Plant Board
Plant Industries Division of the Department of Agriculture has been given to
the person, shall be revoked by the director regardless of whether a
prosecution is commenced.
(2)(A) Any person whose certificate is revoked by the director
shall be entitled to an appeal to the board State Plant Board.
(B) The board's decision shall be final.

2-18-103. Investigation and certification.
(a)(1) The State Plant Board Department of Agriculture is empowered to
investigate and certify to varietal purity and fitness for planting of
agricultural seed on request of the grower thereof.
(2)(A) For this purpose, the board State Plant Board shall set
up, in its rules, one (1) or more classifications of seed, designating the
classifications as “Registered” and “Certified” or by any other one (1) or
more names which it may specify; and
(B) It The board shall specify, in its rules, the
standards which seed must meet and the methods by which seed must be handled
in order to be certified under the classifications.
(b) Any person applying for certification of seed must, if required by
the board department, produce satisfactory evidence as to character,
qualifications as a seed breeder, and possession of such facilities for the
growing and handling of purebred seed as may be deemed necessary by the board
department.

2-18-104. Rules.
The State Plant Board:
(1) Shall promulgate all rules necessary to carry into effect
the purpose of this chapter, which is to provide supplies of high-grade seed,
true to name and free from disease, for planting purposes;
(2) Shall make rules to protect the interest of breeders who
03/10/2025 4:45:09 PM CRH153

HB1742
have developed high-quality strains of seed; and
(3) May appoint or may authorize the Director of the State Plant
Board Plant Industries Division to appoint such deputies as shall be
necessary to carry into effect the purpose of this chapter.

2-18-105. Fees Costs.
(a)(1) To cover costs of inspection and certification, the State Plant
Board shall require a reasonable fees of sum from all applicants in advance.
(2) Upon receipt of an application, the Department of
Agriculture will invoice the applicant for payment.
(3) These fees sums invoiced under subdivision (a)(2) of this
section shall be deposited into a separate fund and shall be used in carrying
out the purposes of this chapter.
(b)(1)(A) To cover costs of promotion and advertising of certified
seed, the board after a public hearing shall establish by rule promotion and
advertising fees which shall be collected in advance costs.
(B) The fees costs under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this
section shall be assessed upon the acreage grown for certified agricultural
seed production or upon the number of certified tags and labels sold for
production of certified seed from the acreage.
(C) The department shall assess the costs under
subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section and shall invoice the responsible party
for payment.
(2) Those fees costs collected for seed promotion and
advertising shall be remitted by the board to the Arkansas Seed Dealers'
Association and the Arkansas Seed Growers Association, or their successors,
which shall establish and administer their own promotion and advertising
programs.
(3) Before collecting the fees costs under this subsection or
increasing those fees the costs hereafter, the board shall seek the advice of
the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development and
the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development.

2-18-106. Certificates of inspection.
(a) Persons whose seed has met the standards set up by the State Plant
Board and who have complied with all the provisions of this chapter and with
03/10/2025 4:45:09 PM CRH153

HB1742
all the rules of the board made under this chapter shall receive from the
board Department of Agriculture the proper certificate of inspection
designating the classification of seed.
(b) Each bag or other container of seed sold under the classification
designated by a certificate of the board department shall bear an appropriate
tag or label securely attached to it.
(c) Certificates issued under the provisions of this section shall run
one (1) crop season only.

2-18-107. Improper use of terms.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to use the terms “certified”
or “registered” as applied to the quality of seed or plants or to use any
other term applying to seed classifications promulgated by the State Plant
Board, without first having applied for and received the proper certificate
from the board Department of Agriculture.
(b) Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be
punished as provided in § 2-18-102.

2-18-108. Intergovernmental cooperation.
In administering this chapter, the State Plant Board Department of
Agriculture is authorized to cooperate to the fullest extent with other
agencies of the state and federal government.

2-18-109. Aflatoxin levels.
The level of aflatoxin in Arkansas-grown grain and seed sold or
distributed in this state shall be monitored by the State Plant Board
Department of Agriculture.









03/10/2025 4:45:09 PM CRH153